Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.280

Local authorities.

"Local authorities" includes every county, municipal, or other local public board or body having authority to adopt local police regulations under the Constitution and laws of this state.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.280. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 29; prior: (i) 1943 c 153 s 1, part; 1937 c 188 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6312-1, part; 1923 c 181 s 1, part; 1921 c 96 s 2, part; 1919 c 59 s 1, part; 1917 c 155 s 1, part; 1915 c 142 s 2, part; RRS s 6313, part. (ii) 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part; 1929 c 180 s 1, part; 1927 c 309 s 2, part; RRS s 6362-2, part.]